Idaho, session 2026, H0932.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares that:
(1) In observing the 250th anniversary of the signing of the Declara-
tion of Independence of the United States, it is appropriate to commemorate
the role played by firearms in America's and Idaho's histories.
(2) In United States history, citizen militias were armed with long
rifles in the Revolutionary War to secure liberty. Firearms also powered
westward expansion, enabling pioneers to hunt, defend families, and tame
the frontier against threats like wildlife, outlaws, and harsh conditions.
The Second Amendment to the United States Constitution protects the right to
keep and bear arms as a safeguard against tyranny and for personal security.
(3) In Idaho, explorers, such as Meriwether Lewis and William Clark in
1805 through 1806, depended on rifles for survival while crossing Idaho's
wilderness, hunting game and protecting against dangers. Fur trappers and
mountain men in the early 1800s used accurate rifles in the Snake River re-
gion. During the 1860s gold rushes, such as those in the Idaho communities
of Pierce, Boise Basin, and Idaho City, miners carried revolvers and rifles
for protection from bandits, claim jumpers, and bears while building com-
munities. Ranchers, homesteaders, and farmers in the late 1800s relied on
lever-action and bolt-action rifles to obtain sustenance and for self-de-
fense. Today, firearms support Idaho's thriving hunting and recreational
shooting culture. Idaho has built a strong tradition of responsible gun own-
ership while having one of the highest per-capita gun ownership rates in the
nation.
(4) It is appropriate to engage the people of Idaho in selecting a
firearm to be designated as the official state gun of Idaho. For this reason,
the Legislature herewith submits an advisory question to the electors of
Idaho on the 2026 general election ballot. The results will guide the Legis-
lature as to which gun shall be designated the state gun of Idaho.
SECTION 2. (1) The Secretary of State shall have the advisory question
below placed on the 2026 general election ballot and shall take necessary
steps to have the results on the question tabulated. The advisory question,
unless modified by the Legislative Council pursuant to subsection (3) of
this section, shall be as follows:
"Which of the following guns should be designated as the state gun
of Idaho? Please choose only one answer.
(a) Winchester Model 1894 (.30-30);


(b) Winchester Model 1873 "Gun that Won the West" (.44-40);
(c) 1873 Colt Single Action Army Revolver "Peacemaker" (.45 Colt);
(d) M1 Garand rifle (.30-06);
(e) Colt M1911 .45 automatic Colt pistol (.45 ACP); or
(f) Remington Model 700 bolt-action rifle (.30-06)."
(2) The advisory question provided for in this act is hereby declared
to be a measure for the purposes of Chapter 66, Title 67, Idaho Code, and the
provisions of Chapter 66, Title 67, Idaho Code, shall apply thereto.
(3) Prior to submission of the dossier provided for in subsection (4) of
this section, the Legislative Council may add additional guns to the list of
guns provided for in subsection (1) of this section.
(4) The Legislative Council shall, no later than July 1, 2026, prepare
and file with the Secretary of State a dossier containing a brief statement
setting forth, in simple, understandable language, the purpose of the advi-
sory question and a brief description of each firearm identified in the advi-
sory question. The advisory question, brief statement of purpose, and brief
description of each firearm shall be included to the extent practicable in
the voters' pamphlet prepared by the Secretary of State.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.